Massachusetts, session 194th, H4942.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 22 of chapter 32A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the last paragraph, and inserting in place
thereof the following paragraph:-
For the purposes of this section, "licensed mental health professional" shall
mean a licensed physician who specializes in the practice of psychiatry, a licensed psychologist,
a licensed independent clinical social worker, a licensed mental health counselor, a licensed
nurse mental health clinical specialist, a licensed marriage and family therapist or a licensed
rehabilitation counselor within the lawful scope of practice for such therapist.
SECTION 2. Section 47B of chapter 175 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out the second paragraph of subsection (i) and inserting in place thereof the
following paragraph:-
For the purposes of this section, "licensed mental health professional" shall
mean a licensed physician who specializes in the practice of psychiatry, a licensed psychologist,
of 3

a licensed independent clinical social worker, a licensed mental health counselor, a licensed
nurse mental health clinical specialist, a licensed marriage and family therapist, or a licensed
rehabilitation counselor within the lawful scope of practice for such therapist.
SECTION 3. Section 8A of chapter 176A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the second paragraph of subsection (i) and
inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
For the purposes of this section, "licensed mental health professional" shall
mean a licensed physician who specializes in the practice of psychiatry, a licensed psychologist,
a licensed independent clinical social worker, a licensed mental health counselor, a licensed
nurse mental health clinical specialist, a licensed marriage and family therapist, or a licensed
rehabilitation counselor within the lawful scope of practice for such therapist.
SECTION 4. Section 4A of 176B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out the second paragraph of subsection (i) and inserting in place thereof the
following paragraph:-
For the purposes of this section, "licensed mental health professional" shall
mean a licensed physician who specializes in the practice of psychiatry, a licensed psychologist,
a licensed independent clinical social worker, a licensed mental health counselor, a licensed
nurse mental health clinical specialist, a licensed marriage and family therapist, or a licensed
rehabilitation counselor within the lawful scope of practice for such therapist.
SECTION 5. Section 4M of 176G of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the second paragraph of subsection (i) and inserting in
place thereof the following paragraph:-
of 3

For the purposes of this section, "licensed mental health professional" shall
mean a licensed physician who specializes in the practice of psychiatry, a licensed psychologist,
a licensed independent clinical social worker, a licensed mental health counselor, a licensed
nurse mental health clinical specialist, a licensed marriage and family therapist, or a licensed
rehabilitation counselor within the lawful scope of practice for such therapist.
of 3